Utah statutes.
78B-2-303.   One year -- Actions on claims against county, city, or town.
Actions on claims against a county, city, or incorporated town, which have
been rejected by the county  executive, city commissioners, city council, or
board of trustees shall be brought within one year after the first rejection.
